Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-367
Sexual abuse, defined.

Sexual abuse shall include sexual assault as described in section 28-319 or 28-320 and incest as described in section 28-703.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 20.

Defendant's conviction of sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult reversed because evidence was insufficient to establish element of sexual contact. State v. Hulshizer, 245 Neb. 244, 512 N.W.2d 372 (1994).